California statutes. Education Code
(B) An after school education and safety program operated by a participating school pursuant to Article 22.5 (commencing with Section 8482) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(C) A program operated by a participating community learning center pursuant to Article 22.6 (commencing with Section 8484.7) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1.

(2) Annual pupil enrollment shall align to the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program pupil access requirements pursuant to Section 46120 and reflect individual pupil access within an academic year reporting period, as determined by the department.

(3) The department shall ensure that the collection of pupil data pursuant to this section is integrated with existing local educational agency data reporting requirements for
 the California Longitudinal Pupil Achievement Data System.

(b) Beginning with the 2025–26 school year, the department shall identify and reduce data reporting redundancies, and provide guidance and recommendations to local educational agencies,
 in the collection of pupil
 data, including, but not limited to, pupil participation, for each pupil enrolled in an expanded learning opportunity program pursuant to subdivision (a) and existing local educational data reporting requirements for those programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 1003, Sec. 2.   (AB 1113)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 11. Preschool Data [60910. - 60910.]

60910.

By July 1, 2024, the department shall collect the following data:

(a) Pupil data for each pupil enrolled in a California state preschool program operated by a local educational agency, including all applicable data elements that are collected for pupils in transitional kindergarten pursuant to Section 48000, which, in combination with the data collected pursuant to Section 60900, will provide longitudinal pupil data for pupils enrolled in state preschool programs operated by local educational agencies through grade 12. 

(b) The same data for educators in California state preschool programs operated by a local educational agency that is collected for educators in the K–12 classroom setting, to the
 extent that data is collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 901, Sec. 2.   (AB 22)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 34. EVALUATION AND SUNSETTING OF PROGRAMS [62000. - 62005.5.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [62000. - 62005.5.]

62000.

“Sunset” and “sunset date,” as used in this part, mean the date on which specific categorical programs cease to be operative and Sections 62002, 62003, 62004, 62005, and 62005.5 govern program funding.

The educational programs referred to in this part shall cease to be operative on the date specified, unless the Legislature enacts legislation to continue the program.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

62000.2.

The following programs shall sunset on June 30, 1987:

(a) Miller-Unruh Basic Reading Act of 1965.

(b) School improvement program.

(c) Bilingual education.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 79, Sec. 20.   Effective July 19, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

62001.

(a) The intent of the Legislature in enacting this section is to assure a thorough review of programs listed in this part and the funding sources thereof, so that they most effectively, efficiently, and economically meet the needs of pupils and improve schools. It is not the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to remove resources from pupils with special needs or to cease efforts to improve the schools. 

(b) It was the intent of the Legislature in enacting this part to ensure that each categorical program is thoroughly reviewed. It was also intended that programs would be reviewed the year prior to the sunset date so that school districts and county offices of education would not be subject to unnecessary confusion and disruption in planning and administering those programs. 

(c) It is further the intent of the Legislature that the legislative review of programs specified in this part shall consider the appropriateness of state administration by agencies other than by the State Department of Education, such as the Commission on Teacher Credentialing and the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 223, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------

62002.

If the Legislature does not enact legislation to continue a program listed in this part, the funding of that program shall continue for the general purposes of that program as specified in the provisions relating to the establishment and operation of the program. The funds shall be disbursed according to the identification criteria and allocation formulas for the program in effect on the date the program shall cease to be operative pursuant to this part both with regard to state-to-district and district-to-school disbursements. The funds shall be used for the intended purposes of the program, but all relevant statutes and regulations adopted thereto regarding the use of the funds shall not be operative, except as specified in Section 62002.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 223, Sec. 9.)
-------------------------------------------

62002.5.

Parent advisory committees and school site councils which are in existence pursuant to statutes or regulations as of January 1, 1979, shall continue subsequent to the termination of funding for the programs sunsetted by this chapter. Any school receiving funds from Economic Impact Aid or Bilingual Education Aid subsequent to the sunsetting of these programs as provided in this chapter, shall establish a school site council in conformance with the requirements in Section 52012. The functions and responsibilities of such advisory committees and school site councils shall continue as prescribed by the appropriate law or regulation in effect as of January 1, 1979.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1270, Sec. 12.5.   Effective September 30, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

62003.

The Department of Education shall apportion the funds specified in Section 62002 to school districts and shall audit the use of such funds to ensure that such funds are expended for eligible pupils according to the purposes for which the legislation was originally established for such programs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

62004.

The State Auditor shall audit, on a sampling basis, school districts’ use of the funds specified in Section 62002.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 107, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

62005.

If the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that a school district did not comply with the provisions of this chapter, any apportionment subsequently made pursuant to Section 62003 shall be reduced by two times the amount the superintendent determines was not used in compliance with the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 282.)
-------------------------------------------

62005.5.

Notwithstanding Section 62005, if the Superintendent of Public Instruction determines that a school district or county superintendent of schools fails to comply with the purposes of the funds apportioned pursuant to Section 62003, the Superintendent of Public Instruction may terminate the funding to that district or county superintendent beginning with the next succeeding fiscal year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1981, Ch. 100, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 35. USE OF CATEGORICAL FUNDS [63000. - 63001.]



  CHAPTER 1. Expenditure for Direct Services to Pupils [63000. - 63001.]

63000.

The provisions of this chapter shall apply to funds received for the following categorical programs:

(a) Child care and development programs pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 8200) of Part 6.

(b) School and Library Improvement Block Grant pursuant to Article 7 (commencing with Section 41570) of Chapter 3.2 of Part 24.

(c) Bilingual education programs pursuant to Article 1 (commencing with Section 52000) and Article 3 (commencing with Section 52160) of Chapter 7 of Part 28.

(d) Economic Impact Aid programs pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 54000) of Part 29.

(e) The Miller-Unruh Basic Reading Act of 1965 pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 54100) of Part 29.

(f) Compensatory education programs pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 54400) of Part 29, except for programs for migrant children pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 54440) of Chapter 4 of Part 29.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 730, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

63001.

A school district that, in a fiscal year, receives an apportionment for a program specified in Section 63000 shall use no less than 85 percent of that apportionment at schoolsites for direct services to pupils.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 19, Sec. 119.   (SB 78)   Effective June 24, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 36. CONSOLIDATED APPLICATION PROCESS [64000. - 64000.]

64000.

(a) For purposes of this part, Part 37 (commencing with Section 64001), and Part 38 (commencing with Section 65000), a local educational agency is defined as a county office of education, school district, or charter school.

(b) Each local educational agency that elects to apply for funds under this part may submit to the department for approval by the state board a single consolidated application for approval or continuance of those federal categorical programs subject to this part.

(c) This part shall apply to applications for funds under the following programs:

(1) Federal funds provided to the state through the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (ESEA) (Public Law 89-10), as amended by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (ESSA) (Public Law 114-95). These funds exclude those congressional acts funded other than ESEA or ESSA that are provided through federal acts or grants separate from ESEA or ESSA and those ESSA funds that are allocated separately from the consolidated application process.

(2) State categorical programs that are not funded through the local control funding formula. Carryover funds from state
 categorical programs that have a sunset under their own provisions shall be subject to this part.

(d) The consolidated application shall include annual certifications by the school district English learner parent advisory committee, if one has been established pursuant to Section 52063, that the application was developed with the review and advice of that committee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 471, Sec. 3.   (AB 716)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 37. SCHOOL PLANS FOR STUDENT ACHIEVEMENT [64001. - 64001.]

64001.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, as a condition of receiving funding for a program under Part 36 (commencing with Section 64000), a local educational agency shall ensure that each school of the local educational agency that operates any programs subject to Part 36 (commencing with Section 64000) consolidates any plans that are required by those programs into a single plan, unless otherwise prohibited by law. That plan shall be known as the School Plan for Student Achievement (SPSA). If a plan is not required by a program subject to Part 36 (commencing with Section 64000), the governing board or body of a local educational agency may require any school that receives funding from the consolidated application to develop a SPSA.

(b) A local educational agency shall
 not be required to submit the SPSA to the department as part of the consolidated application.

(c) A local educational agency shall ensure, in the consolidated application, that the SPSA has been prepared in accordance with law, that schoolsite councils have developed and approved a SPSA for each school participating in programs funded through the consolidated application process, and that SPSAs were developed with the review, certification, and advice of the school English learner advisory committee, if required.

(d) The department shall monitor and review to ensure that the consolidated application and the SPSA were developed in accordance with law and with the involvement of applicable advisory committees and schoolsite councils.

(e) Onsite school and district compliance reviews of categorical programs shall
 continue, and SPSAs shall be required and reviewed as part of these onsite visits and compliance reviews. The Superintendent shall monitor such compliance. To that end, the Superintendent shall develop monitoring instruments and establish the process and frequency for conducting reviews of school district achievement and compliance with state and federal categorical program requirements. The state board shall review the content of these instruments for consistency with state board policy.

(f) (1) A complaint that a local educational agency has not complied with the requirements of Part 36 (commencing with Section 64000), this part, or Part 38 (commencing with Section 65000) may be filed with a local educational agency pursuant to the Uniform Complaint Procedures set forth in Chapter 5.1 (commencing with Section 4600) of Division 1 of Title 5 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) The department may require submission of the SPSA for any school that is the specific subject of a complaint involving any program or service subject to this part.

(3) The department may require a local educational agency to submit other data or information as may be necessary for the department to effectively administer any program subject to this part.

(g) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, the schoolsite council shall develop the content of the SPSA. SPSAs shall be reviewed in accordance with paragraph (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 52062.

(2) The development of the SPSA shall include both of the following actions:

(A) Administration of a comprehensive needs
 assessment pursuant to Section 1114(b)(6) of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95) that forms the basis of the school’s goals contained in the SPSA. The comprehensive needs assessment shall include an analysis of verifiable state data, consistent with all state priorities as noted in Sections 52060 and 52066, and informed by all indicators described in Section 1111(c)(4)(B) of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, including pupil performance against state-determined long-term goals. The school may include any data voluntarily developed by school districts to measure pupil outcomes. If the plan is required by the local governing board or body of the local educational agency only, the local governing board or body of the local educational agency may determine the extent to which the needs assessment applies.

(B) Identification of the process for evaluating and monitoring the implementation of the SPSA and progress towards
 accomplishing the goals set forth in the SPSA.

(3) The SPSA shall include all of the following:

(A) Goals set to improve pupil outcomes, including addressing the needs of pupil groups as identified through the needs assessment in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2).

(B) Evidence-based strategies, actions, or services.

(C) Proposed expenditures, based on the projected resource allocation from the governing board or body of the local educational agency, to address the findings of the needs assessment consistent with the state priorities, including identifying resource inequities, which may include a review of the local educational agency’s budgeting, its local control and accountability plan, and school-level budgeting, if applicable.

(h) SPSAs created under this part may serve as school improvement plans required under federal law for schools identified for targeted support as described in Section 1003(e)(1)(A) of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (Public Law 114-95) or comprehensive support as described in Section 1003(e)(1)(B) of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act, as long as the SPSAs also meet the requirements as established by the federal Elementary and Secondary Education Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-10), as amended by the federal Every Student Succeeds Act. A local educational agency may use the schoolsite council to meet the stakeholder requirements established in Section 1111(d)(1)(B) and Section 1111(d)(2)(B) of the federal Every Student Succeeds Act.

(i) The SPSA required by this section shall be reviewed annually and updated, including proposed expenditure of funds allocated to the school
 through the consolidated application and the local control and accountability plan, if any, by the schoolsite council. The SPSAs shall be reviewed and approved by the governing board or body of the local educational agency at a regularly scheduled meeting whenever there are material changes that affect the academic programs for pupils covered by programs identified in this part. If a SPSA is not approved by the governing board or body of the local educational agency, specific reasons for that action shall be communicated to the schoolsite council. Modifications to any SPSA shall be developed, recommended, and approved or disapproved by the governing board or body of the local educational agency in the same manner.

(j) Single school districts and charter schools may use the local control and accountability plan to serve as the SPSA, provided that the local control and accountability plan meets federal school planning requirements and the
 stakeholder requirements established in subdivision (a) of Section 52062, and is adopted at a public hearing pursuant to Section 52062 or 47606.5, as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 51, Sec. 56.   (SB 75)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 37.5. CATEGORICAL FUNDING [64100. - 64100.]

64100.

It is the intent of the Legislature that all funding for categorical programs that are funded according to formulas based on indicators of pupils’ needs shall be based on district counts of pupils meeting the criteria for the programs. It is further the intent of the Legislature to use the information gained from the reports required by this act to revise and update the funding formulas for categorical programs, as necessary, to ensure that funding is distributed to school districts based on updated indicators of pupils’ needs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 171.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 38. SCHOOLSITE COUNCILS [65000. - 65001.]

65000.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that, to the extent possible, the members of the schoolsite council represent the composition of the school’s pupil population. It is also the intent of the Legislature that, notwithstanding the size of the school, the composition of the schoolsite council ensure parity between the groups referenced in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (c).

(b) A school that operates a program that requires a School Plan for Student Achievement, pursuant to Section 64001, shall establish a schoolsite council.

(c) (1) At an elementary school, the schoolsite council shall
 consist of both of the following groups:

(A) The principal of the school or his or her designee; classroom teachers employed at the school, selected by classroom teachers employed at the school; and school personnel employed at the school who are not teachers, selected by school personnel employed at the school who are not teachers. The classroom teachers selected pursuant to this subparagraph shall constitute a majority of the persons selected pursuant to this subparagraph.

(B) Parents of pupils attending the school, or other members of the school community, selected by parents of pupils attending the
 school. The number of persons selected pursuant to this subparagraph shall equal the number of persons selected pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(2) At a secondary school, the schoolsite council shall consist of both of the following groups:

(A) The principal of the school or his or her designee; classroom teachers employed at the school, selected by classroom teachers employed at the school; and school personnel employed at the school who are not teachers, selected by school personnel employed at the school who are not teachers. The classroom teachers selected pursuant to this subparagraph shall constitute a majority of the persons selected pursuant to this subparagraph.

(B) Parents of pupils attending
 the school, or other members of the school community, selected by parents of pupils attending the school; and pupils attending the school, selected by pupils who are attending the school. The number of persons selected pursuant to this subparagraph shall equal the number of persons selected pursuant to subparagraph (A).

(d) An employee of a school who is also a parent or guardian of a pupil who attends a school other than the school of the parent’s or guardian’s employment is not disqualified by this employment from serving as a parent representative on the schoolsite council established for the school that his or her child or ward attends.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 471, Sec. 7.   (AB 716)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

65001.

(a) Schools with a common site administration may operate a shared schoolsite council if the schoolsite has a pupil population of less than 300.

(b) Up to three schools with a combined pupil population of less than 1,000 may operate a shared schoolsite council if the schools have at least one of the following characteristics:

(1) A shared campus.

(2) Geographic proximity to one another with similar pupil populations.

(c) In the case of a shared schoolsite council, each council shall be composed of members in a manner consistent with subdivision (c) of Section 65000.

(d) (1) If the requirement in paragraph (2) is met, a school with a population of fewer than 300 pupils may operate a schoolsite council that has the representation of all of the following:

(A) One principal.

(B) One teacher, selected by the teachers.

(C) One school staff member representing the other school personnel, selected by the other school personnel.

(D) If the school is an elementary school, three parents or community members selected by parents, or if the school is a secondary school, two parents or community members selected by parents and one pupil selected by the pupils.

 (2) The local
 governing board or body of the local educational agency shall obtain approval from its local bargaining unit, if applicable.

(e) The state board may grant a waiver of any provision of this part to a school district or county office of education. A school district governing board or county board of education, on behalf of a schoolsite council, may request that the state board grant a waiver of any provision of this part.

(f) The state board may adopt rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 51, Sec. 57.   (SB 75)   Effective July 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

TITLE 3. POSTSECONDARY EDUCATION [66000. - 101460.]



DIVISION 5. GENERAL PROVISIONS [66000. - 70115.2.]



  PART 40. DONAHOE HIGHER EDUCATION ACT [66000. - 67400.]



  CHAPTER 1. Title of Part [66000. - 66000.]

66000.

This part shall be known and may be cited as the Donahoe Higher Education Act.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 1.5. Legislative Findings [66002. - 66003.]

66002.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) The Master Plan for Higher Education in California, 1960–75, was originally prepared in 1959, and its recommendations were approved in principle by the affected governing boards of the higher education segments. Subsequently, legislation necessary to implement certain of the master plan’s provisions was enacted, including this part. A need to differentiate the functions of the segments of higher education and rapidly increasing enrollments were primary factors that motivated the creation of the master plan.

(b) Pursuant to Resolution Chapter 285 of the Statutes of 1970, and
 Resolution Chapter 232 of the Statutes of 1971, a joint committee of the Legislature issued its report in 1973, entitled “Report of the Joint Committee on the Master Plan for Higher Education,” which reaffirmed the principles of the original master plan and emphasized a need for the segments of higher education to improve access and educational equity, coordination and planning, governance, and diversity within the entire system. As in the 1960s, legislation necessary to implement certain of the joint committee’s recommendations was enacted, largely through amendments to this part.

(c) (1) Pursuant to Chapter 1507 of the Statutes of 1984, the Commission for the Review of the Master Plan for Higher Education conducted public hearings and deliberations; in 1987, it issued its report and recommendations, “The Master Plan Renewed: Unity, Equity, Quality, and Efficiency in California Postsecondary Education.”

(2) Building on this report and two more years of public dialogue pursuant to Resolution Chapter 175 of the Statutes of 1984, the Joint Committee for the Review of the Master Plan for Higher Education adopted a comprehensive report in 1989, entitled “California Faces. . .California’s Future: Education for Citizenship in a Multicultural Democracy,” that affirms the achievements and the basic structure of the 1960 Master Plan for Higher Education and identifies new challenges for California’s institutions of higher education.

(d) Pursuant to Resolution Chapter 106 of the Statutes of 2009 (A.C.R. 65), the Committee for the Review of the Master Plan for Higher Education conducted a needs-based assessment comprising
 public hearings and deliberations to understand the needs of our state and our people and how our system of higher education can best meet those needs and issued a report titled, “Appreciating Our Past, Ensuring Our Future: A Public Agenda for Public Higher Education in California,” viewing the master plan as a living document, reaffirming the essential tenets of the master plan of universal access, affordability and high quality, and identifying the need for an overarching policy framework of statewide public policy goals based upon the outcomes required, increased accountability both fiscal and programmatic, and more effective coordination and articulation.

(e) California in the 21st century continues experiencing a period of unprecedented population growth and extraordinary social and economic changes while the ability of our state’s public system of higher education to carry out the master plan is at risk.

(f) In the spirit of the original master plan and the subsequent reviews, the Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(1) California has now passed the threshold of becoming a state with a new multicultural majority as the ethnic composition of the population is changing dramatically. Our state’s future economic, social, and cultural development depends upon ensuring that all its citizens have opportunities to develop themselves so that they can contribute their best to society.

(2) Current estimates indicate that California will need to prepare more than one million additional graduates by the year 2025 in public higher education institutions to meet our workforce needs. California needs to prepare now for the projected enrollments in the 21st century. And, if the goals of the master plan and its
 subsequent updates are to be fully achieved, especially if groups that are historically and currently underrepresented increase their rates of participation in higher education, enrollments will most likely exceed even these projections.

(3) California must support an educational system that prepares all Californians for responsible citizenship and meaningful careers in a multicultural society; this requires a commitment from all to make high-quality education available and affordable for every Californian.

(4) To
 accomplish these goals, California’s system of higher education will need to expand.

(5) It is the intent of the Legislature that the work completed by the master plan review committees be used to guide higher education policy.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 201, Sec. 1.   (AB 1901)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

66003.

It is the intent of the Legislature to outline in statute the broad policy and programmatic goals of the master plan and clear, concise statewide goals and outcomes for effective implementation of the master plan, attuned to the public interest of the people and State of California, and to expect the system as a whole and the higher education segments to be accountable for attaining those goals. However, consistent with the spirit of the original master plan and the subsequent updates, it is the intent of the Legislature that the governing boards be given ample discretion in implementing policies and programs necessary to attain those goals.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 201, Sec. 2.   (AB 1901)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [66010. - 66093.4.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [66010. - 66010.]

66010.

(a) Public higher education consists of (1) the California Community Colleges, (2) the California State University, and each campus, branch, and function thereof, and (3) each campus, branch, and function of the University of California.

(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), as used in this part, “independent institutions of higher education” are those nonpublic higher education institutions that grant undergraduate degrees, graduate degrees, or both, and that are formed as nonprofit corporations in this state and are accredited by an agency
 recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(2) For purposes of any code or statute, a national or regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education as of January 1, 2025, shall retain that recognition until July 1, 2029, provided that the accrediting agency continues to operate in substantially the same manner as it did on January 1, 2025.

(c) No provision of this part is intended to regulate, subsidize, or intrude upon private education, including, but not limited to, independent educational institutions and religious schools, nor to vary
 existing state law or state constitutional provisions relating to private education.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 425, Sec. 2.   (SB 744)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 3 of Stats. 2025, Ch. 425.)
-------------------------------------------

66010.

(a) Public higher education consists of (1) the California Community Colleges, (2) the California State University, and each campus, branch, and function thereof, and (3) each campus, branch, and function of the University of California.

(b) As used in this part, “independent institutions of higher education” are those nonpublic higher education institutions that grant undergraduate degrees, graduate degrees, or both, and that are formed as nonprofit corporations in this state and are accredited by an agency recognized by the United States Department of Education.

(c) No provision of this part is intended to
 regulate, subsidize, or intrude upon private education, including, but not limited to, independent educational institutions and religious schools, nor to vary existing state law or state constitutional provisions relating to private education.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2030.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2) and added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 425, Sec. 3.   (SB 744)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Operative January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Comprehensive Mission Statement [66010.1. - 66010.7.]

66010.1.

The purpose of this article is to identify common educational missions shared by educational institutions in California and to differentiate more specific missions and functions between the various educational segments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 4.1.)
-------------------------------------------

66010.2.

The public elementary and secondary schools, the California Community Colleges, the California State University, the University of California, and independent institutions of higher education share goals designed to provide educational opportunity and success to the broadest possible range of our citizens, and shall provide the following:

(a) Access to education, and the opportunity for educational success, for all qualified Californians. Particular efforts should be made with regard to those who are historically and currently underrepresented in both their graduation rates from secondary institutions and in their attendance at California higher educational institutions.

(b) Quality teaching and programs of excellence for their students. This commitment to academic excellence shall provide all students the opportunity to address issues, including ethical issues, that are central to their full development as responsible citizens.

(c) Educational equity not only through a diverse and representative student body and faculty but also through educational environments in which each person, regardless of race, gender, gender identity, gender expression, sexual orientation, age, disability, or economic circumstances, has a reasonable chance to fully develop his or her potential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 637, Sec. 1.   (AB 620)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

66010.3.

The public elementary and secondary schools shall be responsible for academic and general vocational instruction from kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, including preparation of pupils for postsecondary instruction, future participation in California’s economy and society, and adult instruction to the extent of state support.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1198, Sec. 4.3.)
-------------------------------------------

66010.4.

The missions and functions of California’s public and independent segments, and their respective institutions of higher education, shall be differentiated as follows:

(a) (1) The California Community Colleges shall, as a primary mission, offer academic and vocational instruction at the lower division level for both younger and older students, including those persons returning to school. Public community colleges shall offer instruction through but not beyond the second year of college. These institutions may grant the associate in arts and the associate in science degree.

(2) The community colleges’ mission shall include all of
 the following:

(A) The provision of instruction and additional learning supports to close learning gaps for those who need it, instruction in English as a second language, adult noncredit instruction, and support services that help students succeed at the postsecondary level.

(B) The provision of adult noncredit education curricula in areas defined as being in the state’s interest is an essential and important function of the community colleges.

(C) The provision of community services courses and programs is an authorized function of the community colleges if their
 provision is compatible with an institution’s ability to meet its obligations in its primary missions.

(D) The provision of student support services to facilitate academic success and achievement.

(3) A primary mission of the California Community Colleges is to advance California’s economic growth and global competitiveness through education, training, and services that contribute to continuous workforce improvement.

(4) The California Community Colleges may conduct institutional research concerning student learning and retention, and community college programming to facilitate its educational mission.

(5) The provision of instruction and support to close
 learning gaps authorized by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) shall be provided in the form of concurrent support, unless college data and research demonstrates that even with concurrent support a student is highly unlikely to succeed in the course.

(b) (1) The California State University shall offer undergraduate and graduate instruction through the master’s degree in the liberal arts and sciences and professional education, including teacher education. Notwithstanding any other law, undergraduate and graduate degrees may be awarded jointly with international institutions of higher education. Presently established two-year programs in agriculture are authorized, but other two-year programs shall be permitted only when mutually agreed upon by the Trustees of the California State University and the Board of Governors of the
 California Community Colleges.

(2) The doctoral degree may be awarded jointly, as follows:

(A) With the University of California, as provided in subdivision (c) and pursuant to Section 66904.

(B) With one or more independent institutions of higher education, provided that the proposed doctoral program is approved by the California Postsecondary Education Commission.

(C) With international institutions of higher education if the doctoral degree program has been authorized pursuant to Article 4.92 (commencing with Section 66046).

(3) Research, scholarship, and creative activity in support of its undergraduate
 and graduate instructional mission is authorized in the California State University and shall be supported by the state.

(4) The primary mission of the California State University is undergraduate and graduate instruction through the master’s degree.

(c) The University of California may provide undergraduate and graduate instruction in the liberal arts and sciences and in the professions, including the teaching professions. It shall have exclusive jurisdiction in public higher education over instruction in the profession of law and over graduate instruction in the professions of medicine, dentistry, and veterinary medicine. It has the sole authority in public higher education to award the doctoral degree in all fields of learning, except that it may agree with the California State
 University to award joint doctoral degrees in selected fields. The University of California shall be the primary state-supported academic agency for research.

(d) The independent institutions of higher education shall
 provide undergraduate and graduate instruction and research in accordance with their respective missions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 729, Sec. 1.   (AB 2633)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

66010.5.

The mission of the public segments of higher education shall also include a broad responsibility to the public interest, and independent segments of higher education are encouraged to assume a broad responsibility to the public interest. As part of this responsibility, the public and independent segments are encouraged to support programs of public service and to involve faculty and students in these programs.
